Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1918
Attorney General; notice; powers.

(a) The Attorney General shall be given notice of the commencement of any proceeding that the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act authorizes him or her to bring but that has been commenced by another person.

(b) Whenever any provision of the act requires that notice be given to the Attorney General before or after commencing a proceeding or permits him or her to commence a proceeding:

(1) If no proceeding has been commenced, the Attorney General may take appropriate action including, but not limited to, seeking injunctive relief; or

(2) If a proceeding has been commenced by a person other than the Attorney General, the Attorney General, as of right, may intervene in such proceeding.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 18.